test/src/morphology/V-naqgrw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - na’grõ: # Verb 61 'eng /est naerda/fin' - full paradigm
     na’grõ+V+Inf: na’grõ
     na’grõ+V+Ger: na’grõs
     na’grõ+V+Sup: na’grõm
     na’grõ+V+Sup+Ine: na’grõmõs
     na’grõ+V+Sup+Ela: na’grõmõst
     na’grõ+V+Sup+Tra: na’grõmõks
     na’grõ+V+Sup+Abe: na’grõmõt
     na’grõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: na’grõb
     na’grõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: na’grõt
     na’grõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: na’grõbõd
     na’grõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: na’griz
     na’grõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [na’grizt, na’griztõ]
     na’grõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [na’grizt, na’griztõ]
     na’grõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: na’grõ
     na’grõ+V+Cond+Sg3: na’grõks
     na’grõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: na’ggõr
     na’grõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: na’ggõr
     na’grõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: na’grõgid
     na’grõ+V+Jus+Sg3: na’grõg
     na’grõ+V+Quo+Sg3: na’griji
     na’grõ+V+ActPrfPrc: na’grõn
     na’grõ+V+PssPrfPrc: na’ggõrtõd
